Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.660

Demonstration Cities and Metropolitan Development Act—Agreements with federal government—Scope of authority.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all cities shall have the power and authority to enter into agreements with the United States or any department or agency thereof, to carry out the purposes of the Demonstration Cities and Metropolitan Development Act of 1966 (PL 89-754; 80 Stat. 1255), and to plan, organize and administer programs provided for in such contracts. This power and authority shall include, but not be limited to, the power and authority to create public corporations, commissions and authorities to perform duties arising under and administer programs provided for in such contracts and to limit the liability of said public corporations, commissions, and authorities, in order to prevent recourse to such cities, their assets, or their credit.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 177 s 5; 1970 ex.s. c 77 s 1.]

NOTES:

Establishment of public corporations to administer federal grants and programs: RCW 35.21.730 through 35.21.755.